Maine, session 132, LD800.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
DISABILITY RIGHTS CENTER
Disability Rights Maine 0523
Initiative: Appropriates ongoing funding to provide advocacy services to persons with
intellectual disabilities.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $50,000 $50,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $50,000 $50,000
Page 1 - 132LR1779(03)